Wisconsin, session 2025, SB622.
do enact as follows:SB622,1Section 1. 93.01 (7m) of the statutes is created to read:93.01 (7m) “Intermediate livestock handling facility” means an off-premises facility owned or leased by a slaughtering establishment that is licensed by the department or that is subject to inspection by the U.S. department of agriculture and used to unload and temporarily hold animals before the animals are delivered to the slaughtering establishment.SB622,2Section 2. 93.06 (1g) of the statutes is amended to read:93.06 (1g) Certificates of veterinary inspection. Furnish, to veterinarians in this state, forms to be used by them in issuing certificates of veterinary inspection. The department may charge a $2 fee for each form unless the department specifies a different fee by rule fee of $5.60 for each interstate movement form, $1 for each interstate movement form continuation, and 60 cents for each intrastate movement form.SB622,3Section 3. 93.06 (1n) (c) of the statutes is repealed.SB622,4Section 4. 93.07 (10g) of the statutes is created to read:93.07 (10g) Animal health fees. No later than August 1 of each year, to submit to the joint committee on finance and to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature in the manner provided under s. 13.172 (3) a report detailing all of the following:(a) The revenue generated from fees related to animal market licenses, animal dealer licenses, animal trucker licenses, animal transport vehicle registrations, and the license registration of bovine animals, swine, equine animals, poultry and farm-raised game birds, farm-raised deer, fish farms, sheep, goats, and feed lots in the preceding fiscal year.(b) The expenditures of any revenue generated under par. (a) in the preceding fiscal year.SB622,5Section 5. 95.25 (7) of the statutes is created to read:95.25 (7) (a) Upon application, the department may certify a herd of bovine animals as an accredited tuberculosis-free herd if the herd qualifies for that certification under the tuberculosis uniform methods determined by the department. Every certification application under this paragraph shall include a nonrefundable application fee of $100 for a 2-year certification. The department may prorate the fee for certifications of less than 2 years.(b) Upon application, the department may certify a herd of farm-raised deer as an accredited tuberculosis-free herd, a tuberculosis-monitored herd, or a tuberculosis-qualified herd, if the herd qualifies for that certification under 9 CFR 77. To acquire and maintain certification, a keeper of farm-raised deer shall comply with applicable requirements under the tuberculosis uniform methods determined by the department. Every certification application under this paragraph shall include a nonrefundable application fee of $150 for a 3-year certification. The department may prorate the fee for certifications of less than 3 years.(c) Upon application, the department may certify a herd of goats as an accredited tuberculosis-free herd if the herd qualifies for that certification using the bovine tuberculosis uniform methods determined by the department. Every certification application under this paragraph shall include a nonrefundable application fee of $50.(d) To maintain a certification under this subsection, a herd owner shall comply with applicable requirements under the tuberculosis uniform methods as determined by the department.SB622,6Section 6. 95.26 (8) of the statutes is created to read:95.26 (8) (a) Upon application, the department may annually certify a herd of bovine animals, herd of swine, herd of goat, or sheep flock as a brucellosis-free herd or flock if the herd or flock qualifies for that certification under the brucellosis uniform methods determined by department. Every certification application under this paragraph shall include a nonrefundable fee of $50 for an annual certification. (b) Upon application, the department may certify a herd of farm-raised deer as a brucellosis-free herd if the herd qualifies for that certification under the brucellosis uniform methods determined by department. Every certification application under this paragraph shall include a nonrefundable fee of $150 for a 3-year certification. The department may prorate the fee for certifications of less than 3 years.(c) To maintain a certification under this subsection, a herd or flock owner shall comply with applicable requirements under the brucellosis uniform methods as determined by the department.SB622,7Section 7. 95.27 (7m) of the statutes is created to read:95.27 (7m) Upon application, the department may annually certify a herd of swine as a qualified pseudorabies-negative herd if the herd qualifies for that certification under the pseudorabies national eradication standards. Every certification application under this paragraph shall include a nonrefundable fee of $50 for an annual certification. To maintain the certification, the herd owner shall comply with applicable requirements under the pseudorabies national eradication standards.SB622,8Section 8. 95.27 (8) of the statutes is repealed.SB622,9Section 9. 95.51 (2) (c) of the statutes is created to read:95.51 (2) (c) 1. The department may issue a certificate designating a facility as an approved intermediate livestock handling facility for purposes of this section. To obtain certification as an intermediate livestock handling facility, a facility operator shall submit an application on a form provided by the department. The application shall include a nonrefundable fee of $140.2. A person who applies for a certificate after that certificate has expired shall pay, in addition to the fee required subd. 1., a $28 late fee.SB622,10Section 10. 95.51 (9) of the statutes is created to read:95.51 (9) Equine infectious anemia. (a) No person may move an equine animal that tests positive for equine infectious anemia, except as provided by the department. The department shall summarily quarantine every test-positive animal and serve the owner with a quarantine notice.(b) The department shall retest an animal quarantined under par. (a) if, within 10 days after the quarantine notice is served, the owner of the quarantined animal files a written retest request with the department and pays a retest fee of $25.SB622,11Section 11. 95.51 (10) of the statutes is created to read:95.51 (10) Foreign equine imports; quarantine station. (a) No person may receive in this state any stallion or mare imported from another nation in which contagious equine metritis has been reported unless all of the following apply:1. The stallion or mare is imported directly to an equine quarantine station approved under par. (b) in a sealed vehicle that has been sealed at a place, and by an agent, approved by the federal government. The vehicle seal may not be removed, except at the approved equine quarantine station by an authorized employee or agent of the department.2. The person applies for a permit to receive the stallion or mare and pays a nonrefundable $100 application fee and the department issues the permit authorizing the import shipment. A copy of the permit shall accompany the shipment.(b) An imported stallion or mare received at an approved equine quarantine station shall be automatically quarantined until the department releases the quarantine. A quarantine station does not qualify as an approved equine quarantine station unless the operator holds a current annual permit issued by the department. An application for a permit under this paragraph shall include a nonrefundable annual permit fee of $100.SB622,12Section 12. 95.55 (3) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 95.55 (3) (a) (intro.) and amended to read:95.55 (3) (a) (intro.) The department shall, by rule, specify the fee for impose the following nonrefundable registration fees for a herd of farm-raised deer under this section. The, except that the department may not require an individual who is eligible for the veterans fee waiver program under s. 45.44 to pay a fee for registration under this section.:SB622,13Section 13. 95.55 (3) (a) 1. to 3. of the statutes are created to read:95.55 (3) (a) 1. An annual fee of $85 if the herd includes no more than 15 farm-raised deer and the following criteria are met:a. No live farm-raised deer move from the premises except directly to slaughter.b. The farm-raised deer are killed on the premises for consumption by the farm-raised deer keeper or are slaughtered on the premises provided that the department conducts an ante-mortem inspection of the deer and a post-mortem inspection of the carcass under s. 97.42.c. The herd is not enrolled in the chronic wasting disease herd status program maintained by the department.2. An annual fee of $162 if the herd includes no more than 15 farm-raised deer, and the herd does not meet all of the criteria under subd. 1.3. An annual fee of $325 if the herd includes more than 15 farm-raised deer.SB622,14Section 14. 95.55 (3) (am) of the statutes is created to read:95.55 (3) (am) 1. A person who applies to register a medically separated farm-raised deer herd at the same location where another farm-raised deer herd is registered shall pay a nonrefundable fee of $400 a day, or portion of a day, needed to complete the inspection required by the department.2. An applicant for an annual registration certificate shall pay a registration fee surcharge of $250 if the department determines that, within 365 days prior to submitting a complete registration application, the applicant kept farm-raised deer at any location without a required registration certificate that identifies that location. In addition to the surcharge, the applicant shall pay the fee due under par. (a) for the year in which the applicant failed to obtain the required registration certificate.3. A person who applies for an annual registration certificate after that certificate has expired shall pay, in addition to all other fees required under this subsection, a late fee equal to 20 percent of the registration fees.4. A person holding a valid annual registration certificate to keep farm-raised deer at a location in this state who applies for a hunting ranch certificate shall include with the person’s application a nonrefundable fee of $500. A hunting ranch certificate expires 10 years after it is issued, on the anniversary date of its issuance. A hunting ranch certificate is not valid if the certificate holder no longer holds a valid annual registration certificate.SB622,15Section 15. 95.55 (3) (b) 1. and 3. of the statutes are consolidated, renumbered 95.55 (3) (b) and amended to read:95.55 (3) (b) If the department reinspects the premises where farm-raised deer are kept because the department has found a violation of this chapter or rules promulgated under this chapter, the department shall charge the person registered under this section the a reinspection fee specified under subd. 2. 3 of $150. A reinspection fee under this paragraph is payable when the reinspection is completed, and is due upon written demand from the department. The department may issue a demand for payment when it issues a registration renewal application form to the person registered to keep farm-raised deer under this section.SB622,16Section 16. 95.55 (3) (b) 2. of the statutes is repealed.SB622,17Section 17. 95.57 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 95.57 (2) (intro.) and amended to read:95.57 (2) Fees. (intro.) The department shall promulgate a rule to set any fee that it imposes on collect from a person for participation in the national poultry improvement plan. an annual enrollment fee as follows, on the basis of flock type:SB622,18Section 18. 95.57 (2) (a) to (d) of the statutes are created to read:95.57 (2) (a) If the flock includes no more than 200 breeders or consists solely of specialty breeds, other than breeds commonly raised for meat or egg production, and the flock owner raises the birds primarily for exhibition, $40.(b) If the flock owner does not hatch or collect eggs and obtains stock solely from flocks enrolled in the national poultry improvement plan, $40.(c) If the flock includes farm-raised game birds, the flock owner does not hatch or collect eggs, and the flock owner obtains stock solely from flocks enrolled in the national poultry improvement plan, $60. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb622 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb622 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB622 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB622 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB622: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting